Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-709
Game refuges; violation; penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of section 37-708 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1939, c. 43, § 4, p. 202;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-431;

R.S.1943, § 37-421;

Laws 1947, c. 135, § 5, p. 380;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 187;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-421;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 323.